Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 469.176, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Excess increments. (a) The authority deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end annually determine the amount of excess increments for a district, if any. This determination must be based on the tax increment financing plan in effect on December 31 of the year new text begin being reviewed new text end and the increments deleted text begin and other revenuesdeleted text end received as of December 31 of the year. deleted text begin The authority must spend or return the excess increments under paragraph (c) within nine months after the end of the year.deleted text end new text begin If the authority determines there are excess increments for a district, within nine months after December 31, the authority must: new text end new text begin (1) return the excess increments to the county auditor; and new text end new text begin (2) absent an outstanding qualifying pay-as-you-go contract and note, as defined under section 469.1763, subdivision 4, paragraph (e), decertify the district. new text end new text begin (b) The requirement to decertify under paragraph (a) is deferred if: new text end new text begin (1) within nine months after December 31, a modification of the tax increment financing plan is approved under section 469.175, subdivision 4; and new text end new text begin (2) the modification increases the total costs authorized to be paid with increments from the district by an amount greater than the excess increment determined under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) The deferral permitted under paragraph (b) expires nine months following the next year for which: new text end new text begin (1) the authority determines an amount of excess increments exists; new text end new text begin (2) there are no further approved modifications to the tax increment financing plan that increase the total costs authorized to be paid with increments from the district by an amount greater than the excess increment; and new text end new text begin (3) the district has no outstanding qualifying pay-as-you-go contract and note. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end For purposes of this subdivision, "excess increments" equals the excess of: (1) total increments collected from the district since its certification, reduced by any excess increments deleted text begin paiddeleted text end new text begin returnednew text end under paragraph deleted text begin (c), clause (4),deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end for a prior year, over (2) the total costs authorized by the tax increment financing plan to be paid with increments from the district, deleted text begin reduced, but not below zero, by the sum of:deleted text end deleted text begin (i) the amounts of those authorized costs that have been paid from sources other than tax increments from the district; deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) revenues, other than tax increments from the district, that are dedicated for or otherwise required to be used to pay those authorized costs and that the authority has received and that are not included in item (i); deleted text end deleted text begin (iii) the amount of principal and interest obligations due on outstanding bonds after December 31 of the year and not prepaid under paragraph (c) in a prior year; and deleted text end deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end increased by the sum of the transfers of increments made under section 469.1763, subdivision 6, to reduce deficits in other districts made by December 31 of the year. deleted text begin (c) The authority shall use excess increment only to do one or more of the following: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) prepay any outstanding bonds; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) discharge the pledge of tax increment for any outstanding bonds; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) pay into an escrow account dedicated to the payment of any outstanding bonds; or deleted text end deleted text begin (4) return the excess amount todeleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The county auditor deleted text begin who shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end distribute the excess deleted text begin amountdeleted text end new text begin increments returned under paragraph (a)new text end to the city or town, county, and school district in which the tax increment financing district is located in direct proportion to their respective local tax rates. deleted text begin (d) For purposes of a district for which the request for certification was made prior to August 1, 1979, excess increments equal the amount of increments on hand on December 31, less the principal and interest obligations due on outstanding bonds or advances, qualifying under subdivision 1c, clauses (1), (2), (4), and (5), after December 31 of the year and not prepaid under paragraph (c). deleted text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end The county auditor must, prior to February 1 of each year, report to the commissioner of education the amount of any excess tax increment distributed to a school district for the preceding taxable year. deleted text begin (f) For purposes of this subdivision, "outstanding bonds" means bonds which are secured by increments from the district. deleted text end deleted text begin (g) The state auditor may exempt an authority from reporting the amounts calculated under this subdivision for a calendar year, if the authority certifies to the auditor in its report that the total amount authorized by the tax increment plan to be paid with increments from the district exceeds the sum of the total increments collected for the district for all years by 20 percent. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section applies to all districts and is effective for excess increment determinations for calendar year 2026 and thereafter. new text end